Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-111
Bonds; endorsement of approval required.

The approval of each official bond shall be endorsed upon such bond by the officer approving the same, and no bond shall be filed and recorded until so approved.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 11, p. 97;

R.S.1913, § 5717;

C.S.1922, § 5047;

C.S.1929, § 12-111;

R.S.1943, § 11-111.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).

County judge will not be compelled by mandamus to approve bond of county commissioner where oath not endorsed thereon. State ex rel. Baird v. Slattery, 108 Neb. 415, 187 N.W. 899 (1922).

If bond is executed by sufficient competent sureties, approval may be compelled by mandamus. Woodward v. State ex rel. Thomssen, 58 Neb. 598, 79 N.W. 164 (1899).